Nebraska, session 109, LB220.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB220 LB220
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that disparities
exist for people with developmental and intellectual disabilities in this
state which include differences in economic, employment, health,
education, and public safety outcomes between the population of the state
as a whole and the population of the state who are persons with
developmental and intellectual disabilities.
(2) The Legislature shall provide for the creation of a
developmental and intellectual disability impact note for proposed
legislation that uses data and research to estimate the potential effects
of a legislative bill on disparities described in subsection (1) of this
section for persons with developmental and intellectual disabilities
within this state, including a statement of whether the legislation is
likely to increase or decrease such disparities, to assist legislators in
identifying and evaluating the anticipated or potential impact the
legislative bill may have on persons with developmental and intellectual
disabilities.
(3) A request for the creation of a developmental and intellectual
disability impact note shall be made to the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council. Such request may be made by a member of the
Legislature who introduces a legislative bill that is expected to have an
impact on persons with developmental and intellectual disabilities or the
chairperson of a committee that is preparing to schedule a hearing for a
legislative bill that may have an impact on persons with developmental
and intellectual disabilities. The executive board shall consider and
approve or deny the request for the creation of a developmental and
intellectual disability impact note.
(4) The Director of Research of the Legislature shall develop
procedures for the creation of a developmental and intellectual
disability impact note that may include data, research, and historical
information. The director may request the cooperation of and information
from any state agency, political subdivision, accredited academic
-2-

LB220 LB220
2025 2025
institution, or subject matter expert in the preparation of a
developmental and intellectual disability impact note.
-3-